Illinois, session 104th, HB5629.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named amounts, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary and 7contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging for 8the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027:9OFFICE OF THE DIRECTOR10Payable from the General Revenue Fund:11  For Personal Services.............................2,800,00012  For State Contributions to Social Security..........214,20013  For Contractual Services............................200,00014  For Travel...........................................80,00015    Total                                          $3,294,200 16    Section 10. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 18and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:19DIVISION OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION20Payable from the General Revenue Fund:21  For Personal Services.............................2,700,00022  For State Contribution to Social Security...........206,600  HB5629- 2 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Contractual Services..........................1,800,0002  For Travel...........................................10,0003  For Commodities......................................22,6004  For Printing........................................110,0005  For Equipment........................................19,0006  For Telecommunication Services......................473,0007  For Operation of Auto Equipment.....................185,0008    Total                                          $5,526,2009DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS10OPERATIONS11Payable from the General Revenue Fund:12  For the Administrative and13   Programmatic Expenses in Support of the 14   Department on Aging Grants, Fee for Service,15   Contractual Obligations and Intergovernmental16   Agreements, Including Prior Years' Costs...........225,00017Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:18  For Personal Services.............................1,400,00019  For State Contributions to State20   Employees' Retirement System.......................608,40021  For State Contributions to Social Security..........107,10022  For Group Insurance.................................422,40023  For Contractual Services............................225,00024  For Travel...........................................10,00025  For Commodities.......................................3,00026  For Telecommunication Services.......................50,000  HB5629- 3 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Operation of Auto Equipment.......................6,0002  For the Administrative and3   Programmatic Expenses of4   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............3,500,0005Payable from the Department on Aging  6 State Projects Fund:7  For the Administrative and8   Programmatic Expenses of Private9   Partnership Projects...............................345,000 10    Section 15. The sum of $125,000, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 12Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 13costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 14activities. 15    Section 20. The following named amounts, or so much 16thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 17and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:18DIVISION OF COMMUNITY SUPPORTIVE SERVICES19Payable from the General Revenue Fund:20  For Personal Services.............................1,300,00021  For State Contributions to Social Security...........99,50022  For Contractual Services.............................70,00023  For Travel..........................................100,00024    Total                                          $1,569,500  HB5629- 4 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS2OPERATIONS3Payable from the General Revenue Fund:4  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of the6   Senior Employment Specialist Program...............190,3007  For the Administrative and8   Programmatic Expenses of the9   Senior Employment Program..........................200,00010  For the Administrative and11   Programmatic Expenses of the12   Senior Meal Program (USDA)..........................90,00013Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:14  For Personal Services...............................745,00015  For State Contributions to State16   Employees' Retirement..............................323,80017  For State Contributions to Social Security...........73,50018  For Group Insurance.................................246,40019  For Contractual Services............................700,00020  For Travel..........................................110,00021  For the Administrative and22   Programmatic Expenses of the23   Senior Meal Program USDA...........................225,00024  For the Administrative and25   Programmatic Expenses of26   Older Americans Training...........................200,000  HB5629- 5 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For the Administrative and2   Programmatic Expenses of3   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............2,000,0004  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of6   Title V Services...................................300,0007Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:8  For the Administrative and9   Programmatic Expenses of the10   Home Delivered Meals Program....................63,300,000 1112DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS13GRANTS14Payable from the General Revenue Fund:15  For Grandparents Raising16   Grandchildren Program..............................300,00017  For Support of Senior Programming18   Limited by Rural Conditions........................800,00019Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund: 20  For USDA Child and Adult Food21   Care Program, Including Prior Years' Costs.........450,00022  For Title V Employment Services,23   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................4,000,00024  For Title III B Ombudsman,25   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................2,300,000  HB5629- 6 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Title III Social Services,2   Including Prior Years' Costs....................55,000,0003  For USDA National Lunch Program,4    Including Prior Years' Costs....................3,500,0005  For National Family Caregiver Support Program,6   Including Prior Years' Costs....................13,000,0007  For Title VII Prevention of Elder8   Abuse, Neglect and Exploitation,9   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................1,800,00010  For Title VII Long-Term Care11   Ombudsman Services for Older Americans,12   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................1,400,00013  For Title III D Preventive Health,14   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................4,500,00015  For Nutrition Services Incentive16   Program, Including Prior Years' Costs...........12,000,00017  For Title III C-1 Congregate Meals Program,18   Including Prior Years' Costs....................35,000,00019  For Title III C-2 Home Delivered Meals20   Program, Including Prior Years' Costs...........45,000,00021Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:22  For Retired Senior Volunteer Program................565,00023  For Planning and Service Grants to24   Area Agencies on Aging..........................17,590,50025  For Intergenerational and26   Foster Grandparents Program........................376,400  HB5629- 7 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Equal Distribution of2   Community Based Services.........................1,751,2003  For Caregiver Support Services....................5,273,8004Payable from the Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund:5  For Senior Health Assistance Programs.............2,800,000 6    Section 25. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 7may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 8Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 9costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 10activities. 11    Section 30. The sum of $1,300,000 for administrative and 12programmatic use, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 13appropriated from the Commitment to Human services Fund to the 14Department on Aging for their discretionary use to assist with 15aging service access throughout the State of Illinois. 16    Section 40. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 18and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:19DIVISION OF COMMUNITY CARE SERVICES20Payable from the General Revenue Fund:21  For Personal Services...............................830,00022  For State Contributions to Social Security...........63,50023  For Contractual Services............................250,000  HB5629- 8 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Community Care Services Travel...................55,3002    Total                                          $1,198,8003DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS4OPERATIONS5Payable from the General Revenue Fund:6  For the Administrative and7   Programmatic Expenses of8   Program Development and Training...................400,0009Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:10  For the Administrative and11   Programmatic Expenses of Community12   Care Program Governmental13   Discretionary Projects...........................2,000,00014DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS15GRANTS16Payable from the General Revenue Fund:17  For the Administrative and18   Programmatic Expenses Including19   Grants and Fee For Service Associated20   with the Purchases of Services21   Covered by the Community Care22   Program, Including Prior Years' Costs..........750,500,00023  For the Administrative and Programmatic24   Expenses of Illinois Care Connections,25   Including Prior Years' Costs.....................2,000,00026Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:  HB5629- 9 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1  For Grants, Programmatic and2   Administrative Expenses Associated3   with Comprehensive Case Coordination4   Including Prior Years' Costs....................97,294,9005  For the Administrative and Programmatic6   Expenses Including Grants and Fee7   For Service Associated with the8   Purchases of Services Covered by the9   Community Care Program Including10   Prior Years' Costs...........................1,000,000,000 11    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 13and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:14DIVISION OF AGING CLIENT RIGHTS15DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS16OPERATIONS17Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:18  For the Administrative and19   Programmatic Expenses of Aging Rights20   Governmental Discretionary Projects.............16,000,00021  For the Expenses of Aging Rights22   Training and Conference Planning...................200,00023Payable from the Commitment to Human Services Fund:24  For the Administrative and25   Programmatic Expenses of  HB5629- 10 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1   Adult Protective Services2   Including Prior Years' Costs....................29,684,8003Payable from the Long-term Care Ombudsman Fund:4  For the Administrative and5   Programmatic Expenses of the6   Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program,7   Including Prior Years' Costs....................10,525,500 8    Section 50. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 10Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 11costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 12activities. 13    Section 55. The following named amounts, or so much 14thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 15and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:16DIVISION OF COMMUNITY OUTREACH17Payable from the General Revenue Fund:18  For Personal Services...............................773,80019  For State Contributions to Social Security...........59,60020  For Contractual Services.............................20,00021  For Travel...........................................15,00022    Total                                            $868,40023DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS24OPERATIONS  HB5629- 11 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1Payable from the General Revenue Fund:2  For the Administrative and3   Programmatic Expenses of Illinois4   Council on Aging....................................10,0005  For the Administrative and6   Programmatic Expenses of7   Senior Community Outreach Events.................1,000,0008  For the Administrative and9   Programmatic Expenses of10   Senior HelpLine..................................4,400,00011Payable from the Senior Health Insurance Program Fund:12  For the Administrative and13   Programmatic Expenses of the14   Senior Health Insurance Program..................2,700,00015Payable from the Services for Older Americans Fund:16  For the Administrative and17   Programmatic Expenses of18   Governmental Discretionary Projects..............2,500,000 19    Section 60. The amount of $125,000, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department on Aging 21Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department on Aging for all 22costs associated with administration and programmatic grant 23activities. 24    Section 65. The following named amounts, or so much   HB5629- 12 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1thereof as may be necessary, are appropriated for the ordinary 2and contingent expenses for the Illinois Department on Aging:3OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY4DISTRIBUTIVE ITEMS5OPERATIONS6Payable from the General Revenue Fund:7  For Electronic Data Processing....................8,265,100 8    Section 70. The sum of $53,868, or so much of that amount 9as may be necessary and remains unexpended at the close of 10business on June 30, 2026, from an appropriation heretofore 11made for such purposes in Article 40, Section 70 of Public Act 12104-0003, as amended is reappropriated from the General 13Revenue Fund to the Department on Aging for a grant to the Age 14Options in Oak Park for operating expenses. 15    Section 75. The sum of $37,500, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 17the Department on Aging for a grant to the Senior Services 18Center of Will County for costs associated with the 19Grandparents Raising Grandchildren Pilot Program. 20    Section 80. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 22Fund to the Department on Aging for costs associated with 23Multisector Planning, including but not limited to ordinary   HB5629- 13 -OMB104 00168 LDO 10168 b1and contingent expenses. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32026.